Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.275

Street improvements—Provision of supplies or materials.

Any city or town may assist a street abutter in improving the street serving the abutter's premises by providing asphalt, concrete, or other supplies or materials. The furnishing of supplies or materials or paying to the abutter the cost thereof and the providing of municipal inspectors and other incidental personnel shall not render the street improvements a public work or improvement subject to competitive bidding. The legislative authority of such city or town shall approve any such assistance at a public meeting and shall maintain a public register of any such assistance setting forth the value, nature, purpose, date and location of the assistance and the name of the beneficiary.

[ 1983 c 103 s 1.]